Utah statutes.
58-37c-15.   Civil forfeiture.

The following shall be subject to forfeiture in accordance with the procedures and substantive protections of Title 24, Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act:

(1)  all listed controlled substance precursor chemicals regulated under the provisions of this chapter which have been distributed, possessed, or are intended to be distributed or otherwise transferred in violation of any felony provision of this chapter; and

(2)  all property used by any person to facilitate, aid, or otherwise cause the unlawful distribution, transfer, possession, or intent to distribute, transfer, or possess a listed controlled substance precursor chemical in violation of any felony provision of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 185, 2002 General Session

